test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ngodiTS_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - ӈодя: # Noun 'berry' - full paradigm /Type 17 MDTN-koodi ya→yi/
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom: ӈодя
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Acc: ӈодямʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Gen: ӈодяʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Dat: ӈодянʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Loc: ӈодяхана
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Abl: ӈодяхад
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Pros: ӈодявна
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom: ӈодяхаʼ
     ӈодя+N+Du+Acc: ӈодяхаʼ
     ӈодя+N+Du+Gen: ӈодяхаʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom: ӈодяˮ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Acc: ӈоди
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Gen: ӈодиˮ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Dat: ӈодяхаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Loc: ӈодяхаˮна
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Abl: ӈодяхат
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Pros: ӈодиˮмана
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈодяв, ӈодями]
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈодяв, ӈодями]
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [ӈодян, ӈодяни]
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [ӈодяхан, ӈодяхани]
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [ӈодяханан, ӈодяханани]
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [ӈодяхадан, ӈодяхадани, ӈодяхадни]
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [ӈодявнан, ӈодявнани]
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈодяхаюн, ӈодяхаюни]
     ӈодя+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈодяхаюн, ӈодяхаюни]
     ӈодя+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [ӈодяхаюн, ӈодяхаюни]
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈодин, ӈодини]
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈодин, ӈодини]
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [ӈодиˮн, ӈодиˮни]
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [ӈодяхаˮн, ӈодяхаˮни]
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [ӈодяхаˮнан, ӈодяхаˮнани]
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [ӈодяхатан, ӈодяхатани, ӈодяхатни]
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [ӈодиˮманан, ӈодиˮманани]
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ӈодяр
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: ӈодямд
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: ӈодянд
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: ӈодяханд
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: ӈодяхананд
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: ӈодяхаданд
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: ӈодявнанд
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: ӈодяхаюд
     ӈодя+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: ӈодяхаюд
     ӈодя+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: ӈодяхают
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: ӈодид
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: ӈодид
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: ӈодит
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: ӈодяхат
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: ӈодяхаˮнат
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: ӈодяхатат
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: ӈодиˮманат
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ӈодяда
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: ӈодямда
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: ӈодянда
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: ӈодяханда
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: ӈодяхананда
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: ӈодяхаданда
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: ӈодявнанда
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: ӈодяхаюда
     ӈодя+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: ӈодяхаюда
     ӈодя+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: ӈодяхаюта
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ӈодида
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: ӈодида
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: ӈодита
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: ӈодяхата
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: ӈодяхаˮната
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [ӈодяхатата, ӈодяхатта]
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: ӈодиˮманата
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: ӈодямиʼ
#     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: ӈодями #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: ӈодямиʼ
#     ӈодя+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: ӈодями #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ӈодяниʼ
#     ӈодя+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: ӈодяни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: ӈодяханиʼ
#     ӈодя+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: ӈодяхани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: ӈодяхананиʼ
#     ӈодя+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: ӈодяханани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [ӈодяхаданиʼ, ӈодяхадниʼ]
#     ӈодя+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [ӈодяхадани, ӈодяхадни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: ӈодявнаниʼ
#     ӈодя+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: ӈодявнани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: ӈодяхаюниʼ
#     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: ӈодяхаюни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈодя+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: ӈодяхаюниʼ
#     ӈодя+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: ӈодяхаюни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈодя+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: ӈодяхаюниʼ
#     ӈодя+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: ӈодяхаюни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: ӈодиниʼ
#     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: ӈодини #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: ӈодиниʼ
#     ӈодя+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: ӈодини #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: ӈодиˮниʼ
#     ӈодя+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: ӈодиˮни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: ӈодяхаˮниʼ
#     ӈодя+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: ӈодяхаˮни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: ӈодяхаˮнаниʼ
#     ӈодя+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: ӈодяхаˮнани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [ӈодяхатаниʼ, ӈодяхатниʼ]
#     ӈодя+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [ӈодяхатани, ӈодяхатни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: ӈодиˮмананиʼ
#     ӈодя+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: ӈодиˮманани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: ӈодяриʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: ӈодямдиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: ӈодяндиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: ӈодяхандиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: ӈодяханандиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: ӈодяхадандиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: ӈодявнандиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: ӈодяхаюдиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: ӈодяхаюдиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: ӈодяхаютиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: ӈодидиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: ӈодидиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: ӈодитиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: ӈодяхатиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: ӈодяхаˮнатиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [ӈодяхататиʼ, ӈодяхаттиʼ]
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: ӈодиˮманатиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: ӈодядиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: ӈодямдиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: ӈодяндиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: ӈодяхандиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: ӈодяханандиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: ӈодяхадандиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: ӈодявнандиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: ӈодяхаюдиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: ӈодяхаюдиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: ӈодяхаютиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: ӈодидиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: ӈодидиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: ӈодитиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: ӈодяхатиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: ӈодяхаˮнатиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [ӈодяхататиʼ, ӈодяхаттиʼ]
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: ӈодиˮманатиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ӈодяваˮ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: ӈодяваˮ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: ӈодянаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: ӈодяханаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: ӈодяхананаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [ӈодяхаданаˮ, ӈодяхаднаˮ]
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: ӈодявнанаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: ӈодяхаюнаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: ӈодяхаюнаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: ӈодяхаюнаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: ӈодинаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: ӈодинаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: ӈодиˮнаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: ӈодяхаˮнаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: ӈодяхаˮнанаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [ӈодяхатанаˮ, ӈодяхатнаˮ]
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: ӈодиˮмананаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: ӈодяраˮ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: ӈодямдаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: ӈодяндаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: ӈодяхандаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: ӈодяханандаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: ӈодяхадандаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: ӈодявнандаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: ӈодяхаюдаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: ӈодяхаюдаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: ӈодяхаютаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: ӈодидаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: ӈодидаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: ӈодитаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: ӈодяхатаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: ӈодяхаˮнатаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [ӈодяхататаˮ, ӈодяхаттаˮ]
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: ӈодиˮманатаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: ӈодядоʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: ӈодямдоʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: ӈодяндоʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: ӈодяхандоʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: ӈодяханандоʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: ӈодяхадандоʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: ӈодявнандоʼ
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: ӈодяхаюдоʼ
     ӈодя+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: ӈодяхаюдоʼ
     ӈодя+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: ӈодяхаютоʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: ӈодидоʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: ӈодидоʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: ӈодитоʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: ӈодяхатоʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: ӈодяхаˮнатоʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [ӈодяхататоʼ, ӈодяхаттоʼ]
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: ӈодиˮманатоʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Abs: ӈодяд
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈодядав, ӈодядув, ӈодядами]
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈодядав, ӈодядув, ӈодядами]
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [ӈодядан, ӈодядани]
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: ӈодядар
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: ӈодядамд
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: ӈодяданд
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: ӈодядада
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: ӈодядамда
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: ӈодяданда
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: ӈодядамиʼ
#     ӈодя+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: ӈодядами #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: ӈодядамиʼ
#     ӈодя+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: ӈодядами #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: ӈодяданиʼ
#     ӈодя+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: ӈодядани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: ӈодядариʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: ӈодядамдиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: ӈодядандиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: ӈодядадиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: ӈодядамдиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: ӈодядандиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: ӈодядаваˮ
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: ӈодядаваˮ
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: ӈодяданаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: ӈодядараˮ
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: ӈодядамдаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: ӈодядандаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: ӈодядадоʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: ӈодядамдоʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: ӈодядандоʼ
     ӈодя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: ӈодядмʼ
     ӈодя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: ӈодян
     ӈодя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈодя
     ӈодя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: ӈодяниʼ
     ӈодя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: ӈодядиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈодяхаʼ
     ӈодя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: ӈодяваˮ
     ӈодя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: ӈодядаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈодяˮ
     ӈодя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: ӈодядамзь
     ӈодя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: ӈодянась
     ӈодя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈодясь
     ӈодя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: ӈодянинзь
     ӈодя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: ӈодядинзь
     ӈодя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈодяханзь
     ӈодя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: ӈодяваць
     ӈодя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: ӈодядаць
     ӈодя+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈодяць
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈодяв
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈодяр
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈодяда
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈодямиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈодяриʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈодядиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈодяваˮ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈодяраˮ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈодядоʼ
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈодявась
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈодярась
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈодядась
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈодяминзь
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈодяринзь
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈодядинзь
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈодяваць
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈодяраць
     ӈодя+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈодядонзь
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈодяхаюн
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈодяхаюд
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈодяхаюда
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈодяхаюниʼ
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈодяхаюдиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈодяхаюдиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈодяхаюнаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈодяхаюдаˮ
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈодяхаюдоʼ
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈодяхаюнась
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈодяхаюдась
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈодяхаюдась
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈодяхаюнинзь
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈодяхаюдинзь
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈодяхаюдинзь
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈодяхаюнаць
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈодяхаюдаць
     ӈодя+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈодяхаюдонзь
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈодин
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈодид
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈодида
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈодиниʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈодидиʼ
     ӈодя+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈодидиʼ
